Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There are appropriated  to the Department of Justice, for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following pur-
poses:
(1) Office of the Attorney General
and Administration ................... $ 744,939
(2) Appellate Division ..................... $ 350,507
(3) Criminal Justice Division.......... $ 14,940,476
(4) Crime Victim and Survivor
Services..................................... $ 14,341,791
(5) Defense of Criminal
Convictions................................ $ 27,892,449
(6) Division of Child Support .......... $ 36,352,778
(7) Child Support Enforcement
Automated System .................... $ 2,137,146
(8) Debt service and related
costs .......................................... $ 14,165,382
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice,
for the following purposes:
(1) Office of the Attorney
General and administration ...... $ 39,896,329
(2) Appellate Division ..................... $ 23,851,965
(3) Civil Enforcement Division ....... $113,441,977
(4) Criminal Justice Division.......... $ 9,665,093
(5) Crime Victim and Survivor
Services..................................... $ 30,400,379
(6) General Counsel Division .......... $ 66,145,693
(7) Trial Division ............................ $ 39,042,838
Enrolled Senate Bill 5515 (SB 5515-A) Page 1
(8) Division of Child Support .......... $ 27,501,439
(9) Child Support Enforcement
Automated System .................... $ 3,687,823
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses  from federal funds collected or received by the Department of Justice for the
following purposes:
(1) Civil Enforcement Division ....... $ 4,992,035
(2) Criminal Justice Division.......... $ 1,433,726
(3) Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division....................... $  50,242,262
(4) Division of Child Support .......... $119,535,778
(5) Child Support Enforcement
Automated System .................... $ 11,307,249
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5515 (SB 5515-A) Page 2